Utah statutes.
40-10-25.1.   Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund created -- Contents -- Use of
monies.
(1) (a)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund known as the
"Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund."
(b) (i)  The fund shall consist of the monies specified in Subsections (2) and
(3).
(ii)  The monies of Subsection (2) shall be segregated from the monies of
Subsection (3).
(2) (a)  Monies received by the state from the following sources shall be
deposited into the Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund:
(i)  recovered liens filed against privately owned land as provided by Section
40-10-28;
(ii)  fees for the use of reclaimed lands as provided by Section 40-10-28;
(iii)  fines collected for violations of this chapter or any rule or order
issued under this chapter;
(iv)  donations designated for reclamation of abandoned mines; and
(v)  interest credited to the fund pursuant to Subsection (2)(b).
(b)  Monies received under Subsection (2)(a) shall be invested by the state
treasurer and the income earned shall be credited to the Abandoned Mine
Reclamation Fund, except interest income earned over $19,000 per year shall be
credited to the General Fund.
(c)  The division may at any time expend monies deposited into the fund under
Subsection (2)(a) to accomplish the purposes of the abandoned mine reclamation
program.
(3) (a) (i)  Monies received by the state from the secretary of the United
States Department of Interior, which are granted as special state set-aside
monies in accordance with 30 U.S.C. Sec. 1232 et seq. shall be deposited in
the Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund.
(ii)  Monies deposited into the fund under Subsection (3)(a)(i) shall be
invested by the state treasurer and the income earned shall be credited to the
Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund.
(b)  After August 3, 1992, the division shall use the monies deposited into
the Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund under this Subsection (3) to accomplish
the purposes set forth in Sections 40-10-25 through 40-10-28.1.
(c)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(d), the monies deposited into the
Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund under this Subsection (3) shall be made
available to the division through legislative appropriations.
(d)  The director of the division with the concurrence of the board may at any
time expend monies deposited into the Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund under
Subsection (3)(a) for any emergency requiring immediate reclamation.
